Utah statutes.
9-7-510.   Estimate of money.

(1)  The library board of directors shall furnish to the county executive and county legislative body, in writing, and prior to the time required by law to levy county taxes, an estimate of the amount of money necessary to establish, equip, and maintain the library, and to provide library services during the next ensuing fiscal year and shall certify the amount.

(2)  The county legislative body may, at the time and in the manner of levying other taxes, impose the levy, but the levy may not exceed in any one year .001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property in the county.

